Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Enforcement Orders; Trust Company Management.

§ 81-27-7.101.
Administrative orders; penalties for violation.

In addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the commissioner shall have the power to:

Order any authorized trust institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee to cease and desist violating any provision of this chapter or any lawful rule or regulation issued under this chapter.

Order any authorized trust institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee to cease and desist from a course of conduct that is unsafe or unsound and which is likely to cause insolvency or dissipation of assets or is likely to jeopardize or otherwise seriously prejudice the interests of the public in their relationship with the authorized trust institution.

Order any company to cease engaging in an unauthorized trust activity.

Enter any order pursuant to Section 81-27-2.302.

The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation by any authorized trust institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee of an order issued under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this section. In addition, the commissioner may impose a civil money penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day that an authorized trust institution, or subsidiary thereof, or any director, officer, or employee violates a cease and desist order issued under paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of this section. All civil money penalties collected under this section shall be deposited in the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-7.102.
Notice and opportunity for hearing.

Notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided before any of the foregoing actions may be undertaken by the commissioner. However, in cases involving extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the commissioner may take such action, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing upon application to rescind the action taken.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-7.103.
Subpoena power and examination under oath.

The commissioner shall have the power to subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, require the production of evidence, administer oaths, and examine any person under oath in connection with any subject related to a duty imposed or a power vested in the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-7.104.
Removal of directors, officers and employees.

Consistent with Section 81-27-7.102, the commissioner may require the immediate removal from office of any officer, director, or employee of any authorized trust institution, who is found to be dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of the affairs of the authorized trust institution, or who persistently violates the laws of this state or the lawful orders, instructions, and regulations issued by the commissioner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-7.105.
Review by the court.

Administrative orders issued by the commissioner and civil money penalties imposed for violation of such orders shall be subject to review by the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.